Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB249.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 151B IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "eligible workforce training programs" means programs that meet applicable
requirements in section 83002 of Pub. L. No. 119-21.
(2) The Governor, in consultation with the Kentucky Workforce Innovation Board, shall:
(a) Approve all eligible workforce training programs for purposes of federal Workforce Pell Grants; and
(b) Coordinate approval of eligible workforce training programs with other state and federal workforce
programs to avoid duplicative payments for the same student costs that are covered by federal
Workforce Pell Grants.
(3) The Kentucky Workforce Innovation Board shall establish an internal procedure to:
(a) Determine if a program meets the applicable federal requirements to be an eligible workforce
training program; and
(b) Ensure that the implementation of this section does not impose requirements more restrictive than, or
inconsistent with, any applicable federal rules or regulations governing Workforce Pell Grants.
Section 2. Whereas the Commonwealth of Kentucky has a paramount interest in creating educational
opportunities for all citizens, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act takes effect upon its passage and
approval by the Governor or upon its otherwise becoming a law.
Signed by Governor April 13, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version